Maine, session 132, LD581.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
FINANCE AUTHORITY OF MAINE
Doctors For Maine's Future Scholarship Fund Z090
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds to maintain the Doctors for Maine's Future Scholarship
Program under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A, section 12103-A.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $300,000 $300,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $300,000 $300,000